Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB111.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 61 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1107. Residency of corrections officers.(a) Residency.-- Notwithstanding 71 Pa.C.S. § 2301(b) (relating to examinations requisite for appointment and promotion), the department may hire an applicant or promote an individual as a corrections officer at a State correctional institution who resides outside this Commonwealth.(b) Preference.--A Commonwealth resident shall receive residential preference as an applicant or an individual seeking a promotion as a corrections officer at a State correctional institution. To determine standing on each certified eligibility <--123456789101112131415161718 list, an additional five points shall be applied to the final examination score obtained by a Commonwealth resident who is an applicant or seeking a promotion as a corrections officer at a State correctional institution.(B) PREFERENCE.--WHENEVER THE NAME OF AN APPLICANT WHO MEETS THE RESIDENCY REQUIREMENTS UNDER 71 PA.C.S. § 2301(B)(1) OR (2) APPEARS ON AN ELIGIBLE LIST CERTIFIED AS THE RESULT OF A CIVIL SERVICE EXAMINATION ADMINISTERED IN ACCORDANCE WITH 71 PA.C.S. PT. III (RELATING TO CIVIL SERVICE REFORM) FOR APPOINTMENT TO A CORRECTIONS OFFICER POSITION AT A STATE CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION, THE APPOINTING AUTHORITY, IN MAKING AN APPOINTMENT TO THE POSITION, SHALL GIVE PREFERENCE TO THE APPLICANT IF THE APPLICANT IS AMONG THE THREE HIGHEST-RANKING AVAILABLE INDIVIDUALS ON THE CERTIFICATION OF ELIGIBLES OR WITHIN THE SPECIFIED ALTERNATIVE NUMBER DESIGNATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH 71 PA.C.S. § 2402(B)(2) (RELATING TO SELECTION AND APPOINTMENT OF ELIGIBLES). THE PREFERENCE UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL NOT APPLY TO PROMOTIONAL OPPORTUNITIES.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0111PN1859 - 2 - <--12345678910111213141516171819